District of Columbia statutes.
3-1207.42

Qualifications for licensure.

In addition to the general qualifications for licensure set forth in this chapter, an individual applying for a license to practice pharmaceutical detailing shall:

(1)

Establish, to the satisfaction of the Board of Pharmacy, that he or she is a graduate of a recognized institution of higher education;

(2)

Pay the required licensure fee; and

(3)

Submit to the Board of Pharmacy a notarized statement that he or she understands and agrees to abide by the requirements for the practice of pharmaceutical detailing, including the code of ethics, as established by the Board pursuant to § 3-1202.08 and in accordance with this subchapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 742
as added Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-131, § 102(g), 55 DCR 1659